Florida, session 2026, HB901.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1004.562, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1004.562 University of Florida Diabetes Institute.—
(1) The University of Florida Diabetes Institute is
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb901-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 901 2026
established within the University of Florida College of Medicine
as a resource for diabetes research, screening, prevention,
treatment, and education. The purpose of the institute is to
advance scientific discovery, improve prevention and clinical
care, and promote education and outreach related to all forms of
diabetes, including type 1 diabetes, type 2 diabetes,
gestational diabetes, and related metabolic conditions.
(2) The institute shall do all of the following:
(a) Conduct research to understand the causes, mechanisms,
and potential cures for diabetes, including autoimmune, genetic,
and environmental factors.
(b) Develop advanced prevention, diagnostic, and treatment
strategies to reduce the incidence and complications of diabetes
in children and adults.
(c) Provide comprehensive, multidisciplinary clinical care
to individuals living with diabetes, including patient and
family education, nutrition counseling, mental health support,
and disease management resources.
(d) Train and educate health care professionals, including
physicians, nurses, dietitians, pharmacists, and scientists, to
expand expertise in diabetes care and research.
(e) Establish collaborations with state universities,
medical centers, patient advocacy groups, community
organizations, and government agencies to enhance care and
accelerate progress toward diabetes prevention and cures.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb901-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 901 2026
(f) Engage in community-based outreach and education
programs to increase awareness, reduce disparities in diabetes
outcomes, and promote healthier lifestyles.
(3)(a) The institute may establish and administer
statewide pilot programs, including, but not limited to,
population-based diabetes screening, prevention initiatives, and
technology-driven management tools.
(b) The institute shall maintain a secure data repository
to collect, store, and analyze deidentified data for the purpose
of advancing diabetes research, prevention, and care.
(c) The institute may provide deidentified data, pursuant
to data-sharing agreements, to research collaborators to support
ongoing and future scientific investigations.
(4)(a) The institute may convene a statewide diabetes
research and care consortium composed of clinical and academic
experts, health care providers, and patient representatives to
coordinate research, share expertise, and develop innovative
care models.
(b) The consortium shall, upon being convened, be
administered at the institute under the direction of the
institute's executive leadership.
(c) The consortium may solicit funding from public,
nonprofit, and private sources to expand programs, research
initiatives, and community services.
(5) Beginning October 15, 2027, and annually thereafter,
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb901-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 901 2026
the institute shall provide a report to the Governor, the
President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives which includes all of the following:
(a) Research projects and findings.
(b) Clinical services provided and patient outcomes.
(c) Community outreach and prevention initiatives.
(d) Recommendations for future initiatives.
(6) This section shall be implemented to the extent of
appropriations provided in the annual General Appropriations Act
or from other available funds.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb901-00